Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 5
DANCE HALLS

Editor's note:

This part 5 was added with relocations in 2017. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

30-15-501. License required.

No person, partnership, or corporation shall operate, conduct, carry on, or maintain a public dance hall, booth, pavilion, or other place where public dances are held without first obtaining a license therefor. Any person, firm, or corporation desiring such license shall make application therefor in writing to the board of county commissioners of the county in which the public dance hall, booth, pavilion, or other place is proposed to be located. The application shall state the name and address of the applicant, if a person; the names and addresses of all the persons composing the partnership, if a partnership; and the names and addresses of the officers and directors of the corporation, if a corporation; a full description of the place and premises at which it is proposed to conduct and carry on such public dances; and the term for which the license is desired. The board of county commissioners has the authority, within its discretion, to grant such license to an applicant for the current calendar year or part thereof unexpired upon the payment by the applicant of a fee of twenty-five dollars to the county treasurer. The license shall authorize the person, firm, or corporation receiving it to operate, conduct, and carry on a public dance hall, booth, or pavilion at such place for the term from the date of its issue to the end of the current calendar year for which it is issued. This part 5 shall not apply to incorporated cities and towns.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (SB 17-228), ch. 246, p. 1030, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-18-101 as it existed prior to 2017.

30-15-502. License not transferable.

No license issued under the provisions of this part 5 shall be assigned or transferred by the person, firm, or corporation to whom it is issued, and no license shall be available or used for more than one particular place, building, or premises described in the application and in the license.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (SB 17-228), ch. 246, p. 1031, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-18-102 as it existed prior to 2017.

30-15-503. Revocation or cancellation of licenses.

The board of county commissioners issuing such licenses has full power and authority, at its discretion, to revoke and cancel any license issued by the board under this part 5 whenever the board, by proper resolution, determines that the public morals or public safety or public health of the community requires revocation or cancellation.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (SB 17-228), ch. 246, p. 1031, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-18-103 as it existed prior to 2017.

30-15-504. Penalty.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this part 5 commits a petty offense.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (SB 17-228), ch. 246, p. 1031, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3249, § 506, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-18-104 as it existed prior to 2017.

30-15-505. Jurisdiction.

The county court of the county wherein such licenses are issued has full jurisdiction to try and punish all cases for violation of the provisions of this part 5, subject to the right of appeal in such cases as provided by law.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (SB 17-228), ch. 246, p. 1031, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-18-105 as it existed prior to 2017.